Washington statutes.
RCW 18.400.030

Licensing authority disqualification determination.

(1) When issuing a professional license, government certification, or state recognition, the appropriate licensing authority may not disqualify an individual based on:

(a) A conviction that has been sealed, dismissed, expunged, or pardoned; or

(b) A juvenile adjudication.

(2) The appropriate licensing authority may disqualify an individual from obtaining a professional license, government certification, or state recognition if it determines the individual's conviction is related to the occupation or profession unless the individual has requested and received a certificate of restoration of opportunity under RCW 9.97.020.

[ 2022 c 32 s 2; 2021 c 194 s 3.]